Wyoming, session 2025, SF0053.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 40-1-108(a) by creating a new
paragraph (vi) and 40-2-107(a) by creating a new paragraph
(iv) are amended to read:
40-1-108. Cancellation of registration.
(a) The secretary shall cancel from the register in
whole or in part:
(vi) Any registration if the secretary finds
that cancellation is in the public interest and that the
applicant or registrant has provided fraudulent information
or has failed to correct false information upon request of
the secretary on any filing under this act, subject to the
following:
(A) If the secretary determines that
grounds for cancellation under this paragraph exist, the
secretary shall send the registrant written notice and an
explanation of the secretary's determination by certified
mail;
(B) The registrant may file a response
within sixty (60) days after the written notice and
explanation under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph is
sent to the registrant;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0053
ENROLLED ACT NO. 78, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(C) If the registrant's response does not
demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary
that each ground determined by the secretary for
cancellation does not exist or the registrant does not
respond, the secretary shall cancel the registration and
send written notice of the cancellation to the registrant
by certified mail;
(D) The registrant may appeal the
cancellation to the chancery court or a district court of
competent jurisdiction within thirty (30) days after the
written notice of cancellation under subparagraph (C) of
this paragraph is sent to the registrant. The registrant
appeals by petitioning the chancery court or district court
to set aside the cancellation and attaching to the petition
copies of all documents sent to the registrant and filed
with the secretary pursuant to subparagraphs (A) through
(C) of this paragraph. The chancery court or district court
may summarily order the secretary to reinstate the
cancelled registration or may take other action the
chancery court or district court considers appropriate. The
district court's or chancery court's final decision may be
appealed as in other civil or chancery proceedings.
40-2-107. Cancellation.
(a) The secretary of state shall cancel from the
registration record:
(iv) Any registration if the secretary finds
that cancellation is in the public interest and that the
applicant or registrant has provided fraudulent information
or has failed to correct false information upon request of
the secretary on any filing under this act, subject to the
following:
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0053
ENROLLED ACT NO. 78, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(A) If the secretary determines that
grounds for cancellation under this paragraph exist, the
secretary shall send the registrant written notice and an
explanation of the secretary's determination by certified
mail;
(B) The registrant may file a response
within sixty (60) days after the written notice and
explanation under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph is
sent to the registrant;
(C) If the registrant's response does not
demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary
that each ground determined by the secretary for
cancellation does not exist or the registrant does not
respond, the secretary shall cancel the registration and
send written notice of the cancellation to the registrant
by certified mail;
(D) The registrant may appeal the
cancellation to the chancery court or a district court of
competent jurisdiction within thirty (30) days after the
written notice of cancellation under subparagraph (C) of
this paragraph is sent to the registrant. The registrant
appeals by petitioning the chancery court or district court
to set aside the cancellation and attaching to the petition
copies of all documents sent to the registrant and filed
with the secretary pursuant to subparagraphs (A) through
(C) of this paragraph. The chancery court or district court
may summarily order the secretary to reinstate the
cancelled registration or may take other action the
chancery court or district court considers appropriate. The
district court's or chancery court's final decision may be
appealed as in other civil or chancery proceedings.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0053
ENROLLED ACT NO. 78, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4